Washington statutes.
RCW 35.37.110

General indebtedness bonds—Taxation to pay.

So long as any general indebtedness bonds are outstanding an amount sufficient to pay the interest upon them as it accrues shall be included in each annual levy for municipal purposes and a sufficient amount shall be included in each annual levy for payment of principal so that all bonds may be paid serially as they mature.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.37.110. Prior: 1891 c 128 s 8; RRS s 9546.]